Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1040
Nail technology student, defined.

Nail technology student means a person engaged in the study of the practices of nail technology under the supervision of a nail technology instructor in a nail technology school.

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 15;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-361.07;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 302.